Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Secretary of State.

§79-4-1.30.
Powers.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.30, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Duty of Secretary of State regarding filing of documents, see § 79-4-1.25.

Notice under the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-129.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1612, 1613.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 979.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1819, 1820.

§79-4-1.40.
Act definitions.

In Section 79-4-1.01 et seq.:

“Articles of incorporation” means the original articles of incorporation, all amendments thereof, and any other documents permitted or required to be filed by a domestic business corporation with the Secretary of State under any provision of this chapter except Section 79-4-16.22. If an amendment of the articles or any other document filed under this chapter restates the articles in their entirety, thenceforth the “articles” shall not include any prior documents.

“Authorized shares” means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue.

“Conspicuous” means so written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, text in italics, boldface, contrasting color, capitals or underlined, is conspicuous.

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a corporation for profit, which is not a foreign corporation, incorporated under or subject to the provisions of Section 79-4-1.01 et seq.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery and, if authorized in accordance with Section 79-4-1.41, by electronic transmission.

“Distribution” means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property (except its own shares) or incurrence of indebtedness by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect of any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration or payment of a dividend; a purchase, redemption or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness; or otherwise.

“Documents” means (i) any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes any writing or written instruments, or (ii) an electronic record.

“Domestic unincorporated entity” means an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by the laws of this state.

“Effective date of notice” is defined in Section 79-4-1.41.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic record” means information that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in paper form through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with Section 79-4-1.41(j).

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any form or process of communication, not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible medium, which (i) is suitable for the retention, retrieval and reproduction of information by the recipient, and (ii) is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with Section 79-4-1.41(j).

“Eligible entity” means a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity or a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation.

“Eligible interest” means interests or membership.

“Employee” includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make him also an employee.

“Expenses” means reasonable expenses of any kind that are incurred in connection with a matter.

“Entity” includes domestic and foreign business corporation; domestic and foreign nonprofit corporation; estate; trust; business trust; domestic and foreign unincorporated entity; two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest, and state, United States, and foreign government.

“Facts objectively ascertainable” outside of a filed document or plan is defined in Section 79-4-1.20(k).

“Filing entity” means another entity that is of a type that is created by filing a public organic document.

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation incorporated under a law other than the law of this state, which would be a business corporation if incorporated under the laws of this state.

“Foreign nonprofit corporation” means a corporation incorporated under a law other than the law of this state, which would be a nonprofit corporation if incorporated under the laws of this state.

“Foreign unincorporated entity” means an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by an organic law of a jurisdiction other than this state.

“Governmental subdivision” includes authority, county, district and municipality.

“Includes” denotes a partial definition.

“Individual” means a natural person, and includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased natural person.

“Interest” means either or both of the following rights under the organic law of an unincorporated entity:

“Means” denotes an exhaustive definition.

“Membership” means the rights of a member in a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation.

“Nonprofit corporation” or “domestic nonprofit corporation” means a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state and subject to the provisions of Section 79-11-101 et seq.

“Notice” is defined in Section 79-4-1.41.

“Organic law” means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated entity.

“Person” includes an individual and an entity.

“Principal office” means the office (in or out of this state) so designated in the annual report where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located.

“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative and investigatory action.

“Public corporation” means a corporation that has shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national securities association.

“Qualified director” is defined in Section 79-4-1.43.

“Record date” means the date established under Article 6 or 7 on which a corporation determines the identity of its shareholders and their shareholdings for purposes of Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. The determinations shall be made as of the close of business on the record date unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed.

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under Section 79-4-8.40(c) for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation.

“Shares” means the unit into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided.

“Shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation.

“Sign” or “signature” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document:

“State,” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) and a territory, and insular possession (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) of the United States.

“Subscriber” means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation.

“Unincorporated entity” means an organization or artificial legal person that either has a separate legal existence or has the power to acquire an estate in real property in its own name and that is not any of the following: a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation, an estate, a trust, a state, the United States, or a foreign government. The term includes a general partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, joint-stock association and unincorporated nonprofit association.

“United States” includes district, authority, bureau, commission, department and any other agency of the United States.

“Voting group” means all shares of one or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.

“Voting power” means the current power to vote in the election of directors.

“Writing” or “written” means any information in the form of a document.

The right to receive distributions from the entity either in the ordinary course or upon liquidation; or

The right to receive notice or vote on issues involving its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, or person responsible for managing its business and affairs.

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol to a document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature; or

To attach to or logically associate with an electronic transmission an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature in an electronic transmission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.40; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected an error in a statutory reference in (5) by substituting “Section 79-4-1.41” for “Section 79-7-1.41.” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

The 2000 amendment added (29).

The 2006 amendment added (22), and redesignated former (22) through (31) as present (23) through (32); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (1), (3), (5), (9), (12), (17), (20), (25), (41); added (7) and (8), (10), (11), (13), (14), (21), (22), (26), (28), (29), (31), (36), (44) and (48); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

Hamilton, The background of the new Mississippi Business Corporation Act.
12 Miss. C. L. Rev. 166, Fall, 1991.

§79-4-1.41.
Notice.

Notice under Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. must be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable in the circumstances. Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, words in a notice or other communication under this chapter must be in English.

A notice or other communication may be given or sent by any method of delivery, except that electronic transmissions must be in accordance with this section. If these methods of delivery are impracticable, a notice or other communication may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published, or by radio, television or other form of public broadcast communication.

Notice or other communication to a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may be delivered to its registered agent or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

Notice or other communication may be delivered by electronic transmission if consented to by the recipient or if authorized by subsection (j) of this section.

Any consent under subsection (d) of this section may be revoked by the person who consented by written or electronic notice to the person to whom the consent was delivered. Any such consent is deemed revoked if (1) the corporation is unable to deliver two (2) consecutive electronic transmissions given by the corporation in accordance with such consent, and (2) such inability becomes known to the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation or to the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of notice or other communications; the inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic transmission is received when:

It enters an information-processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic transmissions or information of the type sent, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic transmission; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

If mailed by United States mail postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a recipient other than a shareholder, the earliest when it is actually received or:

If an electronic transmission, when it is received as provided in subsection (f) of this section; and

If oral, when communicated.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgement from an information-processing system described in subsection (f)(1) of this section establishes that an electronic transmission was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

An electronic transmission is received under this section even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

Notice or other communication, if in a comprehensible form or manner, is effective at the earliest of the following:

If in physical form, the earliest of when it is actually received, or when it is left at:

A shareholder’s address shown on the corporation’s record of shareholders maintained by the corporation under Section 79-4-16.01(c);

A director’s residence or usual place of business; or

The corporation’s principal place of business;

If mailed postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a shareholder, upon deposit in the United States mail;

If sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, the date shown on the return receipt signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Five (5) days after it is deposited in the United States mail;

A notice or other communication may be in the form of an electronic transmission that cannot be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice only if (1) the electronic transmission is otherwise retrievable in perceivable form, and (2) the sender and the recipient have consented in writing to the use of such form of electronic transmission.

If Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. prescribes requirements for notices or other communications in particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe requirements for notices or other communications, not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of Section 79-4-1.01 et seq., those requirements govern. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch 486, § 1.41; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 24; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 5 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012) amended this section. Section 24 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012) also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 5 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-1.41 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The 2007 amendment substituted “the secretary of the corporation” for “the corporation or its secretary” in (d).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Other definitions relative to the Mississippi Business Corporation Act,, see § 79-4-1.40.

§79-4-1.42.
Number of shareholders.

For purposes of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation’s current record of shareholders constitutes one (1) shareholder:

Three (3) or fewer co-owners;

A corporation, partnership, trust, estate or other entity;

The trustees, guardians, custodians or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate or account.

For purposes of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., shareholdings registered in substantially similar names constitute one (1) shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.42, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

1979 Mississippi Supreme Court Review: Corporate & Commercial Law. 50 Miss. L. J. 741.

§79-4-1.43.
Qualified director.

A “qualified director” is a director who, at the time action is to be taken under:

Section 79-4-7.44, does not have (i) a material interest in the outcome of the proceeding, or (ii) a material relationship with a person who has such an interest;

Section 79-4-8.53 or 79-4-8.55, (i) is not a party to the proceeding, (ii) is not a director as to whom a transaction is a director’s conflicting interest transaction or who sought a disclaimer of the corporation’s interest in a business opportunity under Section 79-4-8.70, which transaction or disclaimer is challenged in the proceeding, and (iii) does not have a material relationship with a director described in either clause (i) or clause (ii) of this subsection (a)(2);

Section 79-4-8.62, is not a director (i) as to whom the transaction is a director’s conflicting interest transaction, or (ii) who has a material relationship with another director as to whom the transaction is a director’s conflicting interest transaction; or

Section 79-4-8.70, would be a qualified director under subsection (a)(3) if the business opportunity were a director’s conflicting interest transaction.

For purposes of this section:

“Material relationship” means a familial, financial, professional, employment or other relationship that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director’s judgment when participating in the action to be taken; and

“Material interest” means an actual or potential benefit or detriment (other than one which would devolve on the corporation or the shareholders generally) that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director’s judgment when participating in the action to be taken.

The presence of one or more of the following circumstances shall not automatically prevent a director from being a qualified director:

Nomination or election of the director to the current board by any director who is not a qualified director with respect to the matter (or by any person that has a material relationship with that director), acting alone or participating with others;

Service as a director of another corporation of which a director who is not a qualified director with respect to the matter (or any individual who has a material relationship with that director), is or was also a director; or

With respect to action to be taken under Section 79-4-7.44, status as a named defendant, as a director against whom action is demanded, or as a director who approved the conduct being challenged.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

Because plaintiff did not allege with particularity facts establishing that the members of a special committee were not qualified, dismissal of plaintiff’s derivative action was appropriate. Burgess v. Patterson, 188 So.3d 537, 2016 Miss. LEXIS 154 (Miss. 2016).

§79-4-1.44.
Householding.

A corporation has delivered written notice or any other report or statement under this chapter, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to any shareholders who share a common address if:

The corporation delivers one (1) copy of the notice, report or statement to the common address;

The corporation addresses the notice, report or statement to those shareholders either as a group or to each of those shareholders individually or to the shareholders in a form to which each of those shareholders has consented; and

Each of those shareholders consents to delivery of a single copy of such notice, report or statement to the shareholders’ common address.

Any such consent shall be revocable by any of such shareholders who deliver written notice of revocation to the corporation.If such written notice of revocation is delivered, the corporation shall begin providing individual notices, reports or other statements to the revoking shareholder no later than thirty (30) days after delivery of the written notice of revocation.

Any shareholder who fails to object by written notice to the corporation, within sixty (60) days of written notice by the corporation of its intention to send single copies of notices, reports or statements to shareholders who share a common address as permitted by subsection (a), shall be deemed to have consented to receiving such single copy at the common address.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

Notice under the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.41.

Authority to commence proceeding to administratively dissolve corporation, see § 79-4-14.20.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 207, 288.